Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 5. Jails, Waterworks and Other Improvements

§ 17-5-1.
Joint construction, maintenance, and use of jail.

The board of supervisors of any county of the state and the governing authorities of any municipality within such county may enter into a contract for the joint construction, expansion, remodeling and/or maintenance and equipping of a jail in such municipality, or within one (1) mile of the corporate limits thereof, and may issue bonds of both the county and such municipality in the manner provided by general statutes for the issuance of county and municipal bonds for such purposes, provided that in no event shall the municipality bear over fifty percent (50%) of the cost of constructing, expanding, remodeling and/or maintaining and equipping such jail. Such contract or future contracts may provide for the continued joint use of equipping, repairing, reconstructing and remodeling of such jail. Before issuing any bonds for the purposes herein set forth, the board of supervisors and the governing authorities of such municipality shall adopt a joint resolution declaring their intention to issue the same, which resolution shall state the amount and purposes of the bonds to be issued, and shall fix the date upon which action will be taken to provide for the issuance of such bonds. Said resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county, the first publication of such notice to be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such resolution and the last publication to be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the county and municipality, respectively, shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election upon the issuance of such bonds shall be called and held, and in such case such bonds or other evidences of indebtedness shall not be issued unless same are authorized by the affirmative vote of a majority of the qualified electors of said county and municipality, respectively, who vote on the proposition at such election. Notice of such election shall be given by publication in like manner as is provided for the publication of the initial resolution, and said election shall be called, held and conducted and the returns thereof made, canvassed and declared in the same manner as provided by Section 19-9-1 et seq., and Section 21-33-301 et seq., respectively. If no such petition be filed protesting against the issuance of said bonds, then the said board of supervisors and the governing authorities of the municipality shall have the authority to issue said bonds without an election.

If the board of supervisors of a county and the governing authorities of a municipality enter into an agreement under the Regional Economic Development Act or an intergovernmental agreement approved by the Attorney General for the operation of a county jail, such county jail may be located outside the corporate limits of the municipality and is not subject to location restrictions in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art. 20; 1871, § 1367; 1880, § 2148; 1892, § 303; 1906, § 322; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3695; 1930, § 215; 1942, § 2891; Laws, 1962, ch. 241; Laws, 1966, Ex Sess, ch. 27, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 350; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 61, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 17-5-3.
Counties and municipalities with military camps, etc., authorized to construct waterworks and sewage disposal systems.

Counties or municipalities of such counties of the State of Mississippi having in whole or in part a national guard camp, United States army training camp, army air base or artillery range are hereby authorized and empowered, by resolution adopted by a majority vote of their governing bodies, (a) to acquire, lease, construct, improve or extend, within and without their territorial limits, waterworks systems, sewer systems, sewage disposal systems, garbage disposal systems, rubbish disposal systems, or any one or any combination thereof; and (b) to borrow money and issue bonds therefor, pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 without regard to the limitations and restrictions of any other law, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, leasing, construction, improvement or extension of any one or any combination of such systems or public works, which bonds shall be payable as to both principal and interest from revenues derived from the operation of any one or any combination of such systems or public works, as the same may be added to, extended or improved. Bonds issued pursuant to Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 shall be subject to validation under the laws of this state, and nothing in the provisions of such sections shall operate to dispense with approvals respecting the authorized systems or public works by any state department or agency in accordance with law.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section authorizing the acquisition, leasing, construction, improvement or extension of garbage disposal systems and rubbish disposal systems shall not apply in any county having a land area of more than seven hundred (700) square miles and a population of more than ten thousand two hundred (10,200) but not more than ten thousand two hundred fifty (10,250) according to the 1990 federal census.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2987; Laws, 1942, ch. 195; Laws, 1994, ch. 457, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1994).

§ 17-5-5.
Powers in regard to such systems.

Counties of this state, or the municipalities of such counties, are authorized and empowered (1) to own, operate, and maintain any one or any combination of the systems or public works described in Section 17-5-3; (2) to acquire property, real or personal, by contract, gift, grant, purchase, or the exercise of the power of eminent domain in connection with the acquisition, leasing, construction, improvement, extension, ownership, operation, maintenance, and financing of any one or any combination of such systems or public works; (3) to enter into contracts respecting the acquisition, leasing, construction, improvement, extension, ownership, operation, maintenance and financing of any one or any combination of such systems or public works; and (4) to establish, maintain, and collect rates, fees, and charges for the services, facilities, and commodities afforded by any one or any combination of such systems or public works. Such rates, fees, and charges shall be sufficient at all times to provide revenues (a) to pay the reasonable expenses of the operation and maintenance thereof; (b) for the establishment and maintenance of a bond retirement and interest payment fund sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds or other obligations payable therefrom as the same become due and payable, including reasonable reserves for the payment of such principal and interest; and (c) for the establishment and maintenance of a reasonable reserve for future additions, extensions, and improvements to such systems or any combination thereof, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2988; Laws, 1942, ch. 195.

§ 17-5-7.
Bonds authorized.

Bonds authorized and issued pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 may be issued in one or more series, may bear such date or dates, shall mature serially, not later than three years from the date thereof, at such time or times, not exceeding forty years from their respective dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding five per centum (5%) per annum, payable semi-annually, may be in such denomination, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may be payable at such place or places, may carry such registration and conversion privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, may be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, and may be declared or become due before the maturity date thereof, as may be provided by the resolution authorizing their issuance. Such bonds and any interest coupons appertaining thereto shall be executed in accordance with the resolution providing for their authorization and issuance. Bonds issued under Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof, as well as any interest coupons appertaining thereto, shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof any or all of the persons whose signatures or facsimile signatures appearing thereon shall have ceased to be officers of the county issuing the same. Bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 shall be negotiable for all purposes and shall possess all the qualities of a negotiable instrument. Bonds authorized and issued under the provisions of Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 shall be sold and delivered only to the lowest bidder at public sale after notice thereof has been published in accordance with a motion, order, or resolution of the county proposing their issuance and sale, which notice shall be published at least one time, not less than ten days prior to the date fixed for the holding of such public sale, in a daily newspaper published and circulating in the State of Mississippi. Any such bonds may be sold to the United States of America at private sale in furtherance of any loan or grant contract which may be entered into by and between the county proposing to issue such bonds and the United States. The said bonds shall not be sold for less than their par value plus accrued interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2989; Laws, 1942, ch. 195.

§ 17-5-9.
Rights of bondholders.

Any holder or holders of bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 shall have the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus, suit, action, or other proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce his or their rights against the county issuing such bonds, and in the case of a default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any such bonds, to the appointment of a receiver or trustee who shall have the power to enter upon and take possession of the system, or systems, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of such bonds, and to operate and maintain the same, to prescribe and collect rates, fees, or charges in connection with such operation and maintenance, to apply all revenues thereof and to do all things as and in the same manner as the county itself might do. No such receiver or trustee shall have the right to sell any such system or systems or any substantial portion thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2990; Laws, 1942, ch. 195.

§ 17-5-11.
Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 supplemental.

The powers conferred by Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 shall be in addition and supplemental to, and the limitations hereof shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law; and the powers conferred by Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11 are not in substitution for the powers conferred by any other law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2991; Laws, 1942, ch. 195.

§ 17-5-13.
Power of county or municipality to apply for, receive and expend funds from federal government for railroad crossing improvements.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authority of any municipality shall have the power and authority to apply for, receive and expend grants, loans or other funds from the federal government or any department or agency thereof for use in connection with the relocation or grade separation of railroad lines to eliminate grade level railroad crossings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 17-5-15.
Power of county or municipality to lend or lease equipment.

The governing authorities of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality, are each authorized, in their discretion, upon order duly adopted and entered upon their official minutes, to lend to or to enter into leases with other counties or municipalities for the use of county-owned or municipally owned equipment and operators of such equipment. Such equipment and operators may be lent or leased for such amount and in accordance with such terms and conditions as the governing authorities may prescribe; however, such equipment and operators may be used only in the performance of public projects of a county or municipality. The lending or lease agreements also may include an equipment operator’s fee equal to the average hourly salary that is paid to all operators of such county-owned or municipally owned equipment by the county or municipality that lends or leases the equipment. Proceeds from the lending or leasing of such equipment shall be deposited into the road and bridge fund of the county or the municipal general fund, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.